Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.80.010

General laws applicable.

A code city may provide utility service within and without its limits and exercise all powers to the extent authorized by general law for any class of city or town. The cost of such improvements may be financed by procedures provided for financing local improvement districts in chapters 35.43 through 35.54 RCW and by revenue and refunding bonds as authorized by chapters 35.41, 35.67 and 35.89 RCW and Title 85 RCW. A code city may protect and operate utility services as authorized by chapters 35.88, 35.91, 35.92, and 35.94 RCW and may acquire and damage property in connection therewith as provided by chapter 8.12 RCW and shall be governed by the regulations of the department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.48.110.

[ 1988 c 127 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.80.010.]